Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3132.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [120A.43] ASIAN AMERICAN AND PACIFIC ISLANDER HERITAGE MONTH. new text end new text begin A school district is encouraged to commemorate Asian American and Pacific Islander Heritage Month each May. In observance, a school district may provide instruction or conduct a school program to provide students opportunities to learn about the diverse cultures and traditions of the Asian American and Pacific Islander communities, as well as the achievements and contributions of Asian Americans and Pacific Islanders to American history and culture. Among other activities under this section, a school district may partner with a community group to promote and encourage observance of the month. new text end